en: Comté, Comté cheese, Comté cheese from cow's milk
xx: Comté
bg: Комте
eo: Komte
fr: comte
he: קונטה
hu: Comté sajt
hy: Կոնտե
ja: コンテチーズ
ko: 콩테
ru: Конте
uk: Конте
zh: 孔泰奶酪

fr: comté aop
ca: comté DOP
es: comté DOP
nl: Comté AOC

en: Cotija cheese, Cotija
de: Cotija-Käse, Cotija
es: Queso Cotija, Cotija
fr: Queso Cotija, Cotija
hr: kotija sir
hu: Cotija
it: formaggio Cotija
ja: コテハ・チーズ
jv: Cotija kèju, Cotija
ko: 코티하 치즈
ru: Котиха

en: Double Gloucester, Double Gloucester cheese
de: Double Gloucester, Double-Gloucester-Käse
fr: fromage de Double Gloucester
hr: dvostruki gloucester
it: doppio Gloucester

en: edam, edam cheese, Edam cheese from cow's milk
xx: edam
bg: Едамер
ca: Formatge edam
cs: Eidam
cv: Эдам
cy: Edammer
da: edamer, edamerost, edamer ost
de: Edamer, Edamer-Käse
eo: edama fromaĝo
es: edam, queso edam
eu: Edam gazta
fa: پنیر ادامر
fi: Edam, edamjuusto, edamjuustoa
fr: edam, fromage edam
he: אדם
hu: Edami
hy: Էդամ
id: Keju Edam
io: Edamana fromajo
it: Edam, formaggio edam
ja: エダムチーズ
jv: Kèju Edam
ko: 에담 치즈
mk: Едамер
ms: Keju Edam
nb: Edamerost
nl: edam, edammer, Edammer kaas
pl: edam, ser edamski, ser edamer
pt: Edam, queijo edam
ru: Эдам
sk: Eidamský syr
sl: Edamski sir
sr: Edamer
sv: edamer, Edamerost
tl: Keso de bola
tr: Edam peyniri
uk: Едам
zh: 埃德姆芝士

en: emmental, emmental cheese, emmentaler cheese, Emmental cheese from cow's milk
xx: Emmentaler
ar: إمنتال
bg: Ементал, сирене Ементал
bs: Ementaler
ca: emmental, formatge emmental
cs: Ementál, sýr ementál
da: emmental, Emmentaler, emmentaler-ost
de: Emmentaler, Emmentaler Käse
el: Έμενταλ
eo: Emental
es: emmenthal, emmental, queso emmental
eu: Emmental
fa: پنیر امنتال
fi: emmental, emmentaljuusto, emmentaljuustoa
fr: emmental, fromage emmental, emmenthal
gl: Emmental
he: אמנטל
hu: Ementáli
hy: Էմենտալ
id: Keju Emmental
it: Emmental, formaggio emmental
ja: エメンタールチーズ
jv: Kèju Emmental
ko: 에멘탈 치즈
lt: Ementalio sūris
lv: Ementāles siers
mk: Ементалер
ms: Keju Emmental
nb: emmentaler, sveitserost
pl: ementaler, emmentaler, ser ementalski, ser ementaler, ser emmentaler
pt: Emmental
ru: Эмменталь
sk: Ementálsky syr
sl: Ementalski sir
sv: Emmental, emmentalerost, emmentalost
ta: எம்மன்டல்
tr: Emmental peyniri
uk: Емменталь
vi: Pho mát Emmental
yi: עמענטאל
zh: 埃文達芝士

en: Emmental from France
ca: emmental francès
de: Emmentaler aus Frankreich, französischer Emmentaler
es: emmental francés, emmenthal francés
fi: Ranskalaista emmentalia
fr: Emmental de France, emmental français
hr: emental iz Francuske
it: Emmental francese
nl: Emmental uit Frankrijk

en: melted Emmental cheese
ca: emmental fos
de: geschmolzener Emmentaler-Käse
es: emmenthal fundido, emmental fundido
fi: emmental sulatejuusto
fr: emmental fondu
hr: otopljeni sir ementaler
hu: ömlesztett ementáli
it: formaggio Emmental fuso
nl: gesmolten Emmental

en: grated emmental cheese, Emmental cheese grated from cow's milk
ca: formatge emmental rallat, emmental ratllat
da: revet emmentalerost
de: geriebener Emmentaler, geriebener Emmentaler-Käse
es: queso emmental rallado, queso emmenthal rallado
fi: emmentalraaste
fr: emmental râpé, fromage emmental râpé, emmenthal râpé, fromage emmenthal râpé
hr: ribani sir ementalac
hu: reszelt ementáli
it: Formaggio emmental grattugiato
nl: geraspte emmentaler
sv: riven emmentalerost

fr: emmental français râpé
ca: emmental francès ratllat, formatge emmental ratllat
es: queso emmental francés rallado, queso emmenthal francés rallado

en: fromage blanc
af: Fromage blanc
ca: formatge fresc
es: Fromage frais, queso fresco
fr: fromage blanc
ga: Fromage frais
hr: fromage blanc
is: Fromage frais
it: formaggio bianco
ja: フレッシュチーズ
ko: 프로마주 프레
ms: Fromage blanc
nl: verse kaas
pt: queijo branco
sl: sveži sir
sr: sveži sir

fr: fromage blanc frais
ca: formatge blanc fresc
es: queso blanco fresco

en: cream cheese
fr: fromage à la crème
hr: krem sir
it: formaggio cremoso
pl: serek śmietankowy

en: fresh cream cheese
hr: svježi krem ​​sir
it: crema di formaggio fresco

en: Petit suisse, Petits suisses
xx: Petit suisse
fr: Petit suisse, Petits suisses

en: Saint-Moret
xx: Saint-Moret
fr: Saint-Moret

en: Quark
ar: كوارك
az: Kəsmik
be: тварог
ca: formatge quark
cs: tvaroh
da: Kvark
de: Quark, Weißkäse, Topfen, Schotten, Speisequark
es: Queso quark
fi: Rahka, maitorahka
fr: quark
he: גבינה לבנה
hr: quark sir
hu: túró
hy: Կաթնաշոռ
id: Quark
it: Quark
ja: クワルク
ka: ხაჭო
ko: 크바르크
lb: Stoffi
lt: Varškės sūris
lv: biezpiens
nb: kvarg
nl: kwark, plattekaas
nn: kvarg
pl: Twaróg, twarogu, twarogowy, twarogowe, twarogowa, ser twarogowy, serek twarogowy
pt: quark
ru: творог, творожный продукт
sh: quark
sk: Tvaroh
sv: Kvarg
tr: Kesmik
tt: эремчек
uk: домашній сир
wa: Makêye
zh: 奶渣

en: lactose-free quark
fi: laktoositon maitorahka
fr: quark sans lactose
hr: kvark bez laktoze
sv: laktosfritt kvark

en: Lean stern
de: Magerquark, Speisequark Magerstufe
fr: séré maigre
hr: mršava krma
it: quark magro
nl: magere kwark
pl: twaróg odtłuszczony, ser twarogowy odtłuszczony, twarożek odtłuszczony, twaróg chudy, ser twarogowy chudy

en: cottage cheese
bg: извара
de: Hüttenkäse
es: queso cottage
fi: raejuusto
hr: cottage cheese, cottage sir
hu: cottage sajt, cottage cheese
it: fiocchi di latte
pl: serek wiejski